Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3529
Professional geologist; certificate of licensure; seal; use; prohibited acts; enrollment card.

(1) The board shall issue to any applicant, who on the basis of education, experience, and examination has met the requirements of the Geologists Regulation Act, a certificate of licensure as a professional geologist that authorizes such person to carry out the prerogatives of the act. The certificate of licensure shall carry the designation Licensed Professional Geologist. The certificate of licensure shall include the full name of the professional geologist and the license number and shall be signed by the chairperson of the board and the secretary of the board.

(2) The certificate shall be prima facie evidence that the person is entitled to all rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a professional geologist while the certificate of licensure remains unrevoked and unexpired.

(3)(a) Each professional geologist authorized to practice geology shall obtain a seal. The design of the seal shall be determined by the board. The following information shall be on the seal: State of Nebraska; the professional geologist's name; the professional geologist's license number; and the words Licensed Professional Geologist.

(b) Whenever the seal is applied, the professional geologist's signature shall be across the seal. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for application of the seal.

(c) The seal and the date of its placement shall be on all technical submissions and calculations whenever presented to a client or any public or governmental agency. It shall be unlawful for any person to affix such person's seal or to permit such seal to be affixed to any document after the expiration of the certificate or for the purpose of aiding or abetting any other person to evade or attempt to evade the act.

(d) The seal and date shall be placed on all originals, copies, tracings, or other reproducible documents in such a manner that the seal, signature, and date will be reproduced. The application of a professional geologist's seal shall constitute certification that the work was done by such professional geologist or under the responsible charge of such professional geologist. In the case of multiple sealings, the first or title page shall be sealed and dated by all involved. In addition, each sheet shall be sealed and dated by the professional geologist responsible for each sheet. In the case of an organization, each sheet shall be sealed and dated by the professional geologist involved. The professional geologist in responsible charge shall seal and date the title or first sheet.

(e) In the case of a temporary permit issued to an individual from another state, the licensee shall use his or her state of licensure seal and shall affix his or her signature and temporary permit to all of his or her work.

(4) The board shall issue to any applicant who, in the opinion of the board, has met the requirements of the act, an enrollment certificate as geologist-intern that indicates that such geologist-intern's name has been recorded as such in the board office. The geologist-intern enrollment certificate does not authorize the such geologist-intern to practice as a professional geologist.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 77;

Laws 2004, LB 890, § 5;

Laws 2013, LB91, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 24.